California, session 20252026, AB2521.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1259.7 is added to the Water Code, immediately following Section 1259.6, to read:1259.7. (a) The department, in consultation with the board and the Department of Fish and Wildlife, shall select, on or before January 1, 2028, two watersheds that are within, or drain into, the Central Valley to conduct a watershedwide water availability study.(b) The Legislature requests that the California Council on Science and Technology, in consultation with the department and the board, subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for this purpose, undertake and complete a comprehensive study of water availability in the watersheds selected pursuant to subdivision (a). The study shall accomplish, but is not limited to, all of the following:(1) Determine daily flow rates in rivers, streams, and creeks in the watersheds over the past 30 years to the extent data is available.(2) Quantify the maximum allowable diversions under existing permits, licenses, and claims in the watersheds.(3) Quantify water actually diverted under existing permits, licenses, and claims in the watersheds over the past 30 years to the extent data is available.(4) Identify and quantify any water quality or environmental flow requirements, including water quality requirements under licenses from the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, in rivers, streams, and creeks in the watersheds.(5) Determine when and under what conditions water is available in excess of existing claims and regulatory requirements.(c) The comprehensive study of water availability described in subdivision (b) shall be completed within two years of the Legislature appropriating money for purposes of undertaking the study.(c)(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that the study completed pursuant to this section will serve as the water availability analysis for future applications to the board for standard or temporary permits for diversion of water to underground storage in the watersheds selected pursuant to subdivision (a).SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the necessity for more groundwater recharge in the Central Valley to increase water supplies, protect communities from flooding, halt land subsidence that damages infrastructure, and prepare California for the next drought.